Utah statutes.
78A-7-123.   Dissolution of justice courts.
(1) (a)  The county or municipality shall obtain legislative approval to
dissolve a justice court if the caseload from that court would fall to the
district court upon dissolution.
(b)  To obtain approval of the Legislature, the governing authority of the
municipality or county shall petition the Legislature to adopt a joint
resolution to approve the dissolution.
(c)  The municipality or county shall provide notice to the Judicial Council.
(d)  Notice of intent to dissolve a Class I or Class II justice court to the
Judicial Council shall be given not later than July 1 two years prior to the
general session in which the county or municipality intends to seek
legislative approval.
(e)  Notice of intent to dissolve a Class III or Class IV justice court to the
Judicial Council shall be given not later than July 1 immediately prior to the
general session in which the county or municipality intends to seek
legislative approval.
(2) (a)  A county or municipality shall give notice of intent to dissolve a
justice court to the Judicial Council if the caseload of that court would fall
to the county justice court.  A municipality shall also give notice to the
county of its intent to dissolve a justice court.
(b)  Notice of intent to dissolve a Class I or Class II court shall be given
by July 1 at least two years prior to the effective date of the dissolution.
(c)  Notice of intent to dissolve a Class III or Class IV court shall be given
by July 1 at least one year prior to the effective date of the dissolution.
(3)  Upon request from a municipality or county seeking to dissolve a justice
court, the Judicial Council may shorten the time required between the city's
or county's notice of intent to dissolve a justice court and the effective
date of the dissolution.
